Utah statutes.
4-38-7.   Licenses -- Fees -- Duties of licensees.

(1)  The commission may grant licenses for participation in racing and other activities associated with racetracks.

(2)  The commission shall establish a schedule of fees for the application for and renewal and reinstatement of all licenses issued under this chapter.

(3)  Each person holding a license under this chapter shall comply with this chapter and with all rules promulgated and all orders issued by the commission under this chapter.

(4)  Any person who holds a recognized race meet or who participates directly or indirectly in a recognized race meet without being first licensed by the commission as required under this chapter and any person violating any provisions of this chapter is subject to penalties under Section 4-2-15.



Amended by Chapter 322, 2007 General Session

